apertium-id-ms.id.lexc
<b elongkang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elongkeng "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elongkotan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elongsong "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elontang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elontok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eloon "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elot "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elotong "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eluam "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eluas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elubu "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elubur "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eludak "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eludar "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eludru "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elukap "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elukar "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eluku "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elukut "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elulang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eluluk "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elungkang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elungkur "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eluntas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eluru "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elusuk "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b elut "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b emban "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b embar "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b embarap "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b emo "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b ena "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enah "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enak "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enalu "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enara "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enatu "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b encah "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b encana "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enda "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endahara "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endaharawan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endahari "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endala "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endalu "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endar "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endara "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endari "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endawat "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b ende "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endel "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endera "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enderang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enderung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endesa "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endir "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endo "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endoro "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endu "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enduan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endul "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b endung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engawan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engek "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engep "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enggal "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enggala "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enggang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enggil "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enggol "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engik "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engis "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engkah "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engkak "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engkarak "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engkaras "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engkarung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engkatak "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engkawan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engkawang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engkel "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engker "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engkok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engkong "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engku "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engkuang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engkudu "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engkunang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engkung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b engok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enguk "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eni "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enian "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enih "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enitan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enkap "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b ensin "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enta "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b entala "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b entangur "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b entara "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b entaus "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enteh "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enteng "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b entik "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b entol "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b entonit "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b entos "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b entuk "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b entul "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b entulu "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enturung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enua "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enuang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enulung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enur "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enzedrin "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enzena "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enzil "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enzoat "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enzoin "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b enzol "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eo "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eragan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erahi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eraja "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erak "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eraksa "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eram "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erambang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eramin "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eranda "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erandal "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erandang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erangan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erangas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erang "-" berang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erangkal "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eras "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eras "-" beras "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erat "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erek "-" berek "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eremban "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erembang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erengau "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b ereng "-" bereng "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erengos "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b ereo "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eresok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erewok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erguk "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erhala "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eriang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eriani "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eri "-" beri "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erik "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eril "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erilium "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erinda "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b ering "-" bering "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eringin "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erita "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eritawan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erkah "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erkas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erkat "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b ernga "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eroci "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eroga "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erokat "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eronang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erondong "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erongkos "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erongsong "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eronjong "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eronok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eronsang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eroti "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b ertam "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b ertih "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eru "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eruang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eruas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erubuh "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erudu "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erui "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eruju "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erujul "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eruk "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erumbung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erunai "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erunang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eruntus "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eruri "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erus "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b erzanji "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b esalen "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b esan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b esaran "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b esek "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b esengek "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b esi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b esikal "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b esing "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eskal "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eskap "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eskat "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eslit "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b esok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b estek "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b estel "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b estialitas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b estik "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b estir "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b esusu "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b esuta "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b et "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eta "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etak "-" betak "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etara "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etari "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etatas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etatron "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etau "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etet "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eti "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eti "-" beti "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etik "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etina "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eting "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etinga "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etis "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b eton "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etonisasi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<b etutu "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
